Utah statutes.
31A-23a-117.   Special requirements for life settlement providers and producers.

(1)  A life settlement provider or life settlement producer shall be licensed in accordance with this title, with the additional requirements listed in this section.

(2)  A life settlement provider shall provide to the commissioner:

(a)  a detailed plan of operation with the life settlement provider's:

(i)  initial license application; and

(ii)  renewal application;

(b)  a copy of the life settlement provider's most current audited financial statement;

(c)  an antifraud plan that meets the requirements of Section 31A-36-117; and

(d)  a bond or other form of assurance of financial responsibility as provided under rules made in accordance with Section 31A-36-119.

(3)  A life settlement provider shall provide with the life settlement provider's initial license application information describing the life settlement provider's life settlement experience, training, and education.

(4)  A life settlement provider shall provide to the commissioner, within 30 days after a change occurs, new or revised information concerning any of the following:

(a)  officers;

(b)  holders of more than 10% of its stock;

(c)  partners;

(d)  directors;

(e)  members; and

(f)  designated employees.



Amended by Chapter 355, 2009 General Session

